Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-688
Collection procedures; cumulative.

Sections 77-689 to 77-691 shall apply to car line companies taxed under sections 77-680 to 77-691, and the procedure provided in sections 77-689 to 77-691 for collection of such taxes shall be in addition to other procedures available for the collection of such taxes.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 73;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 213.